Utah statutes.
55-5-6.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Food service" includes restaurant, cafeteria, snack bar, vending machines for food and beverages, and goods and services customarily offered in connection with them.

(2) (a)  "Public office building" means all county courthouses, all city or town halls, and all buildings used primarily for governmental offices of the state or any county, city, or town.

(b)  "Public office building" does not include capitol hill facilities as defined in Section 63C-9-102, public schools, state colleges, or state universities.

